Nebraska, session 109, LB29.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB29 LB29
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, each agency shall conduct
a review of all existing and pending rules and regulations and every
three years thereafter.
(2) Each agency head shall designate an individual who is
responsible for oversight of the review.
(3) Each agency shall submit electronically a detailed report of its
findings along with any supporting documentation to the Clerk of the
Legislature on or before June 30 in the year the review is conducted. The
report shall indicate whether:
(a) The rule or regulation is essential to the health, safety, or
welfare of the public;
(b) The costs of the rule or regulation outweigh the benefits;
(c) The agency has a process in place to measure the effectiveness
of the rule or regulation;
(d) A less restrictive alternative has been considered; and
(e) The rule or regulation was promulgated as the result of a (i)
state statutory requirement, (ii) federal mandate, or (iii) court
decision.
(4) Upon receipt of the agency reports required by this section, the
Reference Committee of the Legislature shall reference each report to the
appropriate standing committee of the Legislature based on each
committee's jurisdictional oversight. The committee shall review the
agency report and submit a report electronically to the Clerk of the
Legislature by December 15 of such year. Each committee report shall
include recommendations for legislation, if necessary, to clarify any
rule or regulation or provide recommendations for clarifications to any
rule or regulation.
(5) Agency rulemaking and regulationmaking authorized by the
Administrative Procedure Act shall be suspended during the pendency of
the agency review process mandated by this section with the exception of
any proposed rule or regulation that:
-2-

LB29 LB29
2025 2025
(a) Affects the health, safety, or welfare of the public;
(b) Is time sensitive; or
(c) Is subject to state or federal statutory deadlines.
Sec. 2. Section 84-920, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-920 Sections 84-901 to 84-920 and section 1 of this act, the
Occupational Board Reform Act, and the Personal Privacy Protection Act
shall be known and may be cited as the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 3. Original section 84-920, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-